test/src/morphology/N-nwwrkwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nȭŗkõz: # Noun 204 'eng /est nõrkus/fin' - full paradigm
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Nom: nȭŗkõz
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Gen: nȭŗkõz
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Par: nȭŗkõzt
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Dat: nȭŗkõzõn
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Ins: nȭŗkõzõks
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Ill: nȭŗkõzõ
     nȭŗkõz+N+Sg+Ela: nȭŗkõzõst
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Nom: nȭŗkõzt
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Gen: nȭŗkõzt
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Par: nȭŗkiži
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Dat: nȭŗkõztõn
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Ins: nȭŗkõztõks
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Ill: nȭŗkižiz
     nȭŗkõz+N+Pl+Ela: nȭŗkižist
